Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-2701.02
Sales tax; rate.

Pursuant to section 77-2715.01:

(1) Until July 1, 1998, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent;

(2) Commencing July 1, 1998, and until July 1, 1999, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be four and one-half percent;

(3) Commencing July 1, 1999, and until the start of the first calendar quarter after July 20, 2002, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five percent;

(4) Commencing on the start of the first calendar quarter after July 20, 2002, and until July 1, 2023, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent;

(5) Commencing July 1, 2023, and until July 1, 2024, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on transactions occurring within a good life district as defined in section 77-4403;

(6) Commencing July 1, 2024, and until October 1, 2025, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent, except that such rate shall be two and three-quarters percent on transactions that occur within that portion of a good life district established pursuant to the Good Life Transformational Projects Act which is located within the corporate limits of a city or village; and

(7) Commencing October 1, 2025, the rate of the sales tax levied pursuant to section 77-2703 shall be five and one-half percent.

Laws 1984, LB 892, § 2;

Laws 1986, LB 539, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1059, § 33;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 12;

Laws 2002, LB 1085, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 759, § 5;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 59;

Laws 2024, LB1317, § 81;

Laws 2025, LB707, § 1.

Good Life Transformational Projects Act, see section 77-4401.